Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4391.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23 of chapter 268A is hereby amended by adding the following
subsection:-
(g) Notwithstanding provisions in this chapter, chapter 268B or any other general or
special law to the contrary, public employees may solicit and accept funds and donors may
donate funds, through crowdfunding or otherwise, for the purpose of supporting a first responder,
including firefighters, law enforcement officers or EMS first responders, injured or killed in the
line of duty, and the family and significant others of the first responder.
SECTION 2. The state ethics commission shall, within 180 days from the passage of this
act, promulgate regulations to implement section 1.
of 1